California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every person who commits any assault upon the President or Vice President of the United States, the Governor of any state or territory, any justice, judge, or former judge of any local, state, or federal court of record, any commissioner, referee, or other subordinate judicial officer of any court of record, the secretary or director of any executive agency or department of the United States or any state or territory, or any other official of the United States or any state or territory holding elective office, any mayor, city council member, county supervisor, sheriff, district attorney, prosecutor or assistant prosecutor of any local, state, or federal prosecutor’s office, a former prosecutor or
 assistant prosecutor of any local, state, or federal prosecutor’s office, public defender or assistant public defender of any local, state, or federal public defender’s office, a former public defender or assistant public defender of any local, state, or federal public defender’s office, the chief of police of any municipal police department, any peace officer, any juror in any local, state, or federal court of record, or the immediate family of any of these officials, in retaliation for or to prevent the performance of the victim’s official duties, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), every person who attempts to commit murder against any person listed in subdivision (a) in retaliation for or to prevent the performance of the victim’s official duties, shall be confined in the state prison for a term of 15
 years to life. The provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 shall apply to reduce any minimum term of 15 years in a state prison imposed pursuant to this section, but that person shall not otherwise be released on parole prior to that time.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following words have the following meanings:

(1) “Immediate family” means spouse, child, stepchild, brother, stepbrother, sister, stepsister, mother, stepmother, father, or stepfather.

(2) “Peace officer” means any person specified in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 or Section 830.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 285.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

218.

Every person who unlawfully throws out a switch, removes a rail, or places any obstruction on any railroad with the intention of derailing any passenger, freight or other train, car or engine, or who unlawfully places any dynamite or other explosive material or any other obstruction upon or near the track of any railroad with the intention of blowing up or derailing any such train, car or engine, or who unlawfully sets fire to any railroad bridge or trestle, over which any such train, car or engine must pass with the intention of wrecking such train, car or engine, is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life without possibility of parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

218.1.

Any person who unlawfully and with gross negligence places or causes to be placed any obstruction upon or near the track of any railroad that proximately results in either the damaging or derailing of any passenger, freight, or other train, or injures a rail passenger or employee, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 286.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

219.

Every person who unlawfully throws out a switch, removes a rail, or places any obstruction on any railroad with the intention of derailing any passenger, freight or other train, car or engine and thus derails the same, or who unlawfully places any dynamite or other explosive material or any other obstruction upon or near the track of any railroad with the intention of blowing up or derailing any such train, car or engine and thus blows up or derails the same, or who unlawfully sets fire to any railroad bridge or trestle over which any such train, car or engine must pass with the intention of wrecking such train, car or engine, and thus wrecks the same, is guilty of a felony and punishable with death or imprisonment in the state prison for life without possibility of parole in cases where any person suffers death as a proximate result thereof, or imprisonment in the state prison for life with the possibility of parole, in cases where no person suffers death as a proximate result thereof. The penalty shall be determined pursuant to Sections 190.3 and 190.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

219.1.

Every person who unlawfully throws, hurls or projects at a vehicle operated by a common carrier, while such vehicle is either in motion or stationary, any rock, stone, brick, bottle, piece of wood or metal or any other missile of any kind or character, or does any unlawful act, with the intention of wrecking such vehicle and doing bodily harm, and thus wrecks the same and causes bodily harm, is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, four, or six years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 287.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

219.2.

Every person who willfully throws, hurls, or projects a stone or other hard substance, or shoots a missile, at a train, locomotive, railway car, caboose, cable railway car, street railway car, or bus or at a steam vessel or watercraft used for carrying passengers or freight on any of the waters within or bordering on this state, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or in a state prison, or by fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 248.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

219.3.

Any person who wilfully drops or throws any object or missile from any toll bridge is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Assaults With Intent to Commit Felony, Other Than Assaults With Intent to Murder [220. - 222.]

220.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who assaults another with intent to commit mayhem, rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who assaults another person under 18 years of age with the intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for five, seven, or nine years.

(b) Any person who, in the commission of a
 burglary of the first degree, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 460, assaults another with intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life with the possibility of parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (AB 1844)   Effective September 9, 2010.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

Every person guilty of administering to another any chloroform, ether, laudanum, or any controlled substance, anaesthetic, or intoxicating agent, with intent thereby to enable or assist himself or herself or any other person to commit a felony, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 287.5.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. False Imprisonment and Human Trafficking [236. - 237.]

236.

False imprisonment is the unlawful violation of the personal liberty of another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

236.1.

(a) A person who deprives or violates the personal liberty of another with the intent to obtain forced labor or services, is guilty of human trafficking and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 5, 8, or 12 years and a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(b) A person who deprives or violates the personal liberty of another with the intent to effect or maintain a violation of Section 266, 266h, 266i, 266j, 267, 311.1, 311.2, 311.3, 311.4, 311.5, 311.6, or 518 is guilty of human trafficking and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 8, 14, or 20 years and a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(c) A person who
 causes, induces, or persuades, or attempts to cause, induce, or persuade, a person who is a minor at the time of commission of the offense to engage in a commercial sex act, with the intent to effect or maintain a violation of Section 266, 266h, 266i, 266j, 267, 311.1, 311.2, 311.3, 311.4, 311.5, 311.6, or 518 is guilty of human trafficking. A violation of this subdivision is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison as follows:

(1) Five, 8, or 12 years and a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) Fifteen years to life and a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) when the offense involves force, fear, fraud, deceit, coercion, violence, duress, menace, or threat of unlawful injury to the victim or to another person.

(d) In determining whether a minor was
 caused, induced, or persuaded to engage in a commercial sex act, the totality of the circumstances, including the age of the victim, the victim’s relationship to the trafficker or agents of the trafficker, and any handicap or disability of the victim, shall be considered.

(e) Consent by a victim of human trafficking who is a minor at the time of the commission of the offense is not a defense to a criminal prosecution under this section.

(f) Mistake of fact as to the age of a victim of human trafficking who is a minor at the time of the commission of the offense is not a defense to a criminal prosecution under this section.

(g) The Legislature finds that the definition of human trafficking in this section is equivalent to the federal definition of a severe form of trafficking found in Section 7102(11) of Title 22 of
 the United States Code.

(h) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Coercion” includes a scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a person to believe that failure to perform an act would result in serious harm to or physical restraint against any person; the abuse or threatened abuse of the legal process; debt bondage; or providing and facilitating the possession of a controlled substance to a person with the intent to impair the person’s judgment.

(2) “Commercial sex act” means sexual conduct on account of which anything of value is given or received by a person.

(3) “Deprivation or violation of the personal liberty of another” includes substantial and sustained restriction of another’s liberty accomplished through force,
 fear, fraud, deceit, coercion, violence, duress, menace, or threat of unlawful injury to the victim or to another person, under circumstances where the person receiving or apprehending the threat reasonably believes that it is likely that the person making the threat would carry it out.

(4) “Duress” includes a direct or implied threat of force, violence, danger, hardship, or retribution sufficient to cause a reasonable person to acquiesce in or perform an act which the person would otherwise not have submitted to or performed; a direct or implied threat to destroy, conceal, remove, confiscate, or possess an actual or purported passport or immigration document of the victim; or knowingly destroying, concealing, removing, confiscating, or possessing an actual or purported passport or immigration document of the victim.

(5) “Forced labor or services” means labor or services that are
 performed or provided by a person and are obtained or maintained through force, fraud, duress, or coercion, or equivalent conduct that would reasonably overbear the will of the person.

(6) “Great bodily injury” means a significant or substantial physical injury.

(7) “Minor” means a person less than 18 years of age.

(8) “Serious harm” includes any harm, whether physical or nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of the same background and in the same circumstances to perform or to continue performing labor, services, or commercial sexual acts in order to avoid incurring that harm.

(i) The total circumstances, including the
 age of the victim, the relationship between the victim and the trafficker or agents of the trafficker, and any handicap or disability of the victim, shall be factors to consider in determining the presence of “deprivation or violation of the personal liberty of another,” “duress,” and “coercion” as described in this section.

(j) In any case brought pursuant to this section, the prosecutor shall consider whether to seek protective orders pursuant to Section 136.2.

(k) A court shall report a conviction of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of this section that occurred while the person was using a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210 of the Vehicle Code, to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

236.2.

Law enforcement agencies shall use due diligence to identify all victims of human trafficking, regardless of the citizenship of the person. When a peace officer comes into contact with a person who has been deprived of his or her personal liberty, a minor who has engaged in a commercial sex act, a person suspected of violating subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647, or a victim of a crime of domestic violence or sexual assault, the peace officer shall consider whether the following indicators of human trafficking are present:

(a) Signs of trauma, fatigue, injury, or other evidence of poor care.

(b) The person is withdrawn, afraid to talk, or his or her communication is censored by another person.

(c) The person does not have freedom of movement.

(d) The person lives and works in one place.

(e) The person owes a debt to his or her employer.

(f) Security measures are used to control who has contact with the person.

(g) The person does not have control over his or her own government-issued identification or over his or her worker immigration documents.

(History: Amended November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

236.21.

(a) (1) A victim of human trafficking or abuse, as defined in Section 236.1 of this code or Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, has the right to have a human trafficking advocate and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at an interview by a law enforcement authority, prosecutor, or the suspect’s defense attorney. The law enforcement officer or prosecutor may exclude the support person from the interview if the law enforcement officer or prosecutor believes that the support person’s presence would be detrimental to the process.

(2) Prior to being present at an interview conducted by a law enforcement authority, prosecutor, or the suspect’s
 defense attorney, a human trafficking advocate shall advise the victim of applicable limitations on the confidentiality of communications between the victim and the human trafficking advocate.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Human trafficking advocate” means a person employed by an organization specified in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code.

(B) “Support person” means a family member or friend of the survivor and does not include the human trafficking advocate.

(b) (1) Prior to the commencement of the initial interview by a law enforcement authority or a prosecutor pertaining to a criminal action
 arising out of a human trafficking incident, a victim of human trafficking or abuse, as defined in Section 236.1 of this code or Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, shall be notified orally or in writing by the attending law enforcement authority or prosecutor that the victim has the right to have a human trafficking advocate and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at the interview.

(2) At the time the victim is advised of their rights under paragraph (1), the attending law enforcement authority or prosecutor shall also advise the victim of the right to have a human trafficking advocate and a support person present at an interview by the suspect’s
 defense attorney or investigators or agents employed by the suspect’s defense attorney.

(3) This subdivision applies to investigators and agents employed or retained by law enforcement or the prosecutor.

(c) An initial investigation by law enforcement to determine whether a crime has been committed and the identity of the suspects does not constitute a law enforcement interview for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

236.23.

(a) In addition to any other affirmative defense, it is a defense to a charge of a crime that the person was coerced to commit the offense as a direct result of being a human trafficking victim at the time of the offense and had a reasonable fear of harm. This defense does not apply to a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(b) A defendant asserting the affirmative defense specified in subdivision (a) has the burden of establishing the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

(c) Certified records of a federal, state, tribal, or local court or governmental agency documenting the
 person’s status as a victim of human trafficking at the time of the offense, including identification of a victim of human trafficking by a peace officer pursuant to Section 236.2 and certified records of approval notices or enforcement certifications generated from federal immigration proceedings, may be presented to establish an affirmative defense pursuant to this section. Information contained in governmental agency reports, which is relevant to the identification of a victim of human trafficking by a peace officer pursuant to Section 236.2, may be presented pursuant to this subdivision even if a peace officer did not make an identification pursuant to Section 236.2.

(d) The affirmative defense may be asserted at any time before the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or admission to the truth of the charges and before the
 conclusion of any trial for the offense. If asserted before the preliminary hearing held in a case, the affirmative defense shall, upon request by the defendant, be determined at the preliminary hearing.

(e) If the defendant prevails on the affirmative defense provided under subdivision (a), the defendant is entitled to all of the following relief:

(1) (A) The court shall order that all records in the case be sealed pursuant to Section 851.86.

(B) Records that have been sealed pursuant to this paragraph may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by law enforcement for subsequent investigatory purposes involving persons other than the defendant.

(2) The person shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the charge, and all actions and proceedings by law enforcement personnel, courts, or other government employees that led to the charge shall be deemed not to have occurred.

(3) (A) The person may in all circumstances state that they have never been arrested for, or charged with, the crime that is the subject of the charge or conviction, including without limitation in response to questions on employment, housing, financial aid, or loan applications.

(B) The person may not be denied rights or benefits, including, without limitation, employment, housing, financial aid, welfare, or a loan or other financial accommodation, based on the arrest or charge or their
 failure or refusal to disclose the existence of or information concerning those events.

(C) The person may not be thereafter charged or convicted of perjury or otherwise of giving a false statement by reason of having failed to disclose or acknowledge the existence of the charge, or any arrest, indictment, trial, or other proceedings related thereto.

(f) If, in a proceeding pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare
 and Institutions Code, the juvenile court finds that the offense on which the proceeding is based was committed as a direct result of the minor being a human trafficking victim, and the affirmative defense established in subdivision (a) is established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall dismiss the proceeding and order the relief prescribed in Section 786 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.   (AB 124)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

236.24.

(a) In addition to any other affirmative defense, it is a defense to a charge of a crime that the person was coerced to commit the offense as a direct result of being a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence at the time of the offense and had a reasonable fear of harm. This defense does not apply to a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(b) A defendant asserting the affirmative defense specified in subdivision (a) has the burden of establishing the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

(c) Certified records of a federal, state, tribal, or local court
 or governmental agency documenting the person’s status as a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence at the time of the offense, including identification of a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence by a peace officer and certified records of approval notices or enforcement certifications generated from federal immigration proceedings, may be presented to establish an affirmative defense pursuant to this section. Information contained in governmental agency reports, which is relevant to the identification of a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence, may be presented pursuant to this subdivision even if the defendant was not then identified as a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence.

(d) The affirmative defense may be asserted at any time before the entry of a plea of guilty
 or nolo contendere or admission to the truth of the charges and before the conclusion of any trial for the offense. If asserted before the preliminary hearing held in a case, the affirmative defense shall, upon request by the defendant, be determined at the preliminary hearing.

(e) If the defendant prevails on the affirmative defense provided under subdivision (a), the defendant is entitled to all of the following relief:

(1) (A) The court shall order that all records in the case be sealed pursuant to Section 851.86.

(B) Records that have been sealed pursuant to this paragraph may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by law enforcement for subsequent investigatory purposes involving persons
 other than the defendant.

(2) The person shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the charge, and all actions and proceedings by law enforcement personnel, courts, or other government employees that led to the charge shall be deemed not to have occurred.

(3) (A) The person may in all circumstances state that they have never been arrested for, or charged with, the crime that is the subject of the charge or conviction, including without limitation in response to questions on employment, housing, financial aid, or loan applications.

(B) The person may not be denied rights or benefits, including, without limitation, employment, housing, financial aid, welfare, or a loan
 or other financial accommodation, based on the arrest or charge or their failure or refusal to disclose the existence of or information concerning those events.

(C) The person may not be thereafter charged or convicted of perjury or otherwise of giving a false statement by reason of having failed to disclose or acknowledge the existence of the charge, or any arrest, indictment, trial, or other proceedings related thereto.

(f) If, in a proceeding pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the juvenile court finds that the offense on which the proceeding is based was committed as a direct result of the minor being a victim of intimate partner violence or sexual violence, and the affirmative defense established in subdivision (a) is established by a preponderance of the
 evidence, the court shall dismiss the proceeding and order the relief prescribed in Section 786 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 695, Sec. 3.   (AB 124)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

236.3.

Upon conviction of a violation of Section 236.1, if real property is used to facilitate the commission of the offense, the procedures for determining whether the property constitutes a nuisance and the remedies imposed therefor as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11225) of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of Part 4 shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (SB 677)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

236.4.

(a) Upon the conviction of a person of a violation of Section 236.1, the court may, in addition to any other penalty, fine, or restitution imposed, order the defendant to pay an additional fine not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000). In setting the amount of the fine, the court shall consider any relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the seriousness and gravity of the offense, the circumstances and duration of its commission, the amount of economic gain the defendant derived as a result of the crime, and the extent to which the victim suffered losses as a result of the crime.

(b) Any person who inflicts great bodily injury on a victim in the commission or attempted commission of a violation of Section 236.1 shall be punished by
 an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 5, 7, or 10 years.

(c) Any person who has previously been convicted of a violation of any crime specified in Section 236.1 shall receive an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 5 years for each additional conviction on charges separately brought and tried.

(d) Every fine imposed and collected pursuant to Section 236.1 and this section shall be deposited in the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund, to be administered by the California Emergency Management Agency (Cal EMA), to fund grants for services for victims of human trafficking. Seventy percent of the fines collected and deposited shall be granted to public agencies and nonprofit corporations that provide shelter, counseling, or other direct services for trafficked victims. Thirty percent of the fines collected and deposited
 shall be granted to law enforcement and prosecution agencies in the jurisdiction in which the charges were filed to fund human trafficking prevention, witness protection, and rescue operations.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

236.5.

(a) Within 15 business days of the first encounter with a victim of human trafficking, as defined by Section 236.1, law enforcement agencies shall provide brief letters that satisfy the following Law Enforcement Agency (LEA) endorsement regulations as found in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 214.11 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The LEA must be submitted on Supplement B, Declaration of Law Enforcement Officer for Victim of Trafficking in Persons, of Form I-914. The LEA endorsement must be filled out completely in accordance with the instructions contained on the form and must attach the results of any name or database inquiry performed. In order to provide persuasive evidence, the LEA endorsement must contain a description of the victimization upon which the application is based, including the dates the trafficking in persons and victimization occurred, and be signed by a supervising official responsible for the investigation or prosecution of trafficking in persons. The LEA endorsement must address whether the victim had been recruited, harbored, transported, provided, or obtained specifically for either labor or services, or for the purposes of a commercial sex act.

(c) Where state law enforcement agencies find the grant of a LEA endorsement to be inappropriate for a victim of trafficking in persons, the agency shall within 15 days provide the victim with a letter explaining the grounds of the denial of the LEA. The victim may submit additional evidence to the law enforcement agency, which must reconsider the denial of the LEA within one week of the receipt of additional evidence.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 236.2 by Stats. 2008, Ch. 358, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

236.6.

(a) To prevent dissipation or secreting of assets or property, the prosecuting agency may, at the same time as or subsequent to the filing of a complaint or indictment charging human trafficking under Section 236.1, file a petition with the criminal division of the superior court of the county in which the accusatory pleading was filed, seeking a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, the appointment of a receiver, or any other protective relief necessary to preserve the property or assets. The filing of the petition shall start a proceeding that shall be pendent to the criminal proceeding and maintained solely to effect the remedies available for this crime, including, but not limited to, payment of restitution and
 payment of fines. The proceeding shall not be subject to or governed by the provisions of the Civil Discovery Act as set forth in Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The petition shall allege that the defendant has been charged with human trafficking under Section 236.1 and shall identify that criminal proceeding and the assets and property to be affected by an order issued pursuant to this section. 

(b) The prosecuting agency shall, by personal service or registered mail, provide notice of the petition to every person who may have an interest in the property specified in the petition. Additionally, the notice shall be published for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property affected by the order is located. The notice
 shall state that any interested person may file a verified claim with the superior court stating the nature and amount of his or her claimed interest. The notice shall set forth the time within which a claim of interest in the protected property shall be filed.

(c) If the property to be preserved is real property, the prosecuting agency shall record, at the time of filing the petition, a lis pendens in each county in which the real property is situated that specifically identifies the property by legal description, the name of the owner of record, as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll, and the assessor’s parcel number. 

(d) If the property to be preserved consists of assets under the control of a banking or financial institution, the prosecuting agency, at the time of filing the
 petition, may obtain an order from the court directing the banking or financial institution to immediately disclose the account numbers and value of the assets of the accused held by the banking or financial institution. The prosecuting agency shall file a supplemental petition, specifically identifying which banking or financial institution accounts shall be subject to a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or other protective remedy.

(e) A person claiming an interest in the protected property or assets may, at any time within 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice of the petition, or within 30 days after receipt of actual notice, whichever is later, file with the superior court of the county in which the action is pending a verified claim stating the nature and amount of his or her interest in the
 property or assets. A verified copy of the claim shall be served by the claimant on the Attorney General or district attorney, as appropriate. 

(f) Concurrent with or subsequent to the filing of the petition, the prosecuting agency may move the superior court for, and the superior court may issue, any of the following pendente lite orders to preserve the status quo of the property or assets alleged in the petition: 

(1) An injunction to restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, hypothecating, or otherwise disposing of the property or assets. 

(2) Appointment of a receiver to take possession of, care for, manage, and operate the assets and properties so that they may be maintained and
 preserved. The court may order that a receiver appointed pursuant to this section shall be compensated for all reasonable expenditures made or incurred by him or her in connection with the possession, care, management, and operation of property or assets that are subject to the provisions of this section. 

(3) Requiring a bond or other undertaking, in lieu of other orders, of a value sufficient to ensure the satisfaction of restitution and fines imposed pursuant to Section 236.1.

(g) The following procedures shall be followed in processing the petition: 

(1) No preliminary injunction shall be granted or receiver appointed without notice to the interested parties and a hearing to determine that the order is necessary to
 preserve the property or assets, pending the outcome of the criminal proceedings. However, a temporary restraining order may be issued pending that hearing pursuant to the provisions of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The temporary restraining order may be based upon the sworn declaration of a peace officer with personal knowledge of the criminal investigation that establishes probable cause to believe that human trafficking has taken place and that the amount of restitution and fines established pursuant to subdivision (f) exceeds or equals the worth of the property or assets subject to the temporary restraining order. The declaration may include the hearsay statements of witnesses to establish the necessary facts. The temporary restraining order may be issued without notice upon a showing of good cause to the court. 

(2) The defendant, or a person who has filed a verified claim, shall have the right to have the court conduct an order to show cause hearing within 10 days of the service of the request for a hearing upon the prosecuting agency, in order to determine whether the temporary restraining order should remain in effect, whether relief should be granted from a lis pendens recorded pursuant to subdivision (c), or whether an existing order should be modified in the interests of justice. Upon a showing of good cause, the hearing shall be held within two days of the service of the request for a hearing upon the prosecuting agency. 

(3) In determining whether to issue a preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order in a proceeding brought by a prosecuting agency in conjunction with or subsequent to the filing of an allegation
 pursuant to this section, the court has the discretion to consider any matter that it deems reliable and appropriate, including hearsay statements, in order to reach a just and equitable decision. The court shall weigh the relative degree of certainty of the outcome on the merits and the consequences to each of the parties of granting the interim relief. If the prosecution is likely to prevail on the merits and the risk of the dissipation of assets outweighs the potential harm to the defendants and the interested parties, the court shall grant injunctive relief. The court shall give significant weight to the following factors: 

(A) The public interest in preserving the property or assets pendente lite. 

(B) The difficulty of preserving the property or assets pendente lite where the
 underlying alleged crimes involve human trafficking. 

(C) The fact that the requested relief is being sought by a public prosecutor on behalf of alleged victims of human trafficking. 

(D) The likelihood that substantial public harm has occurred where the human trafficking is alleged to have been committed. 

(E) The significant public interest involved in compensating victims of human trafficking and paying court-imposed restitution and fines. 

(4) The court, in making its orders, may consider a defendant’s request for the release of a portion of the property affected by this section in order to pay reasonable legal fees in connection with the criminal proceeding,
 necessary and appropriate living expenses pending trial and sentencing, and for the purpose of posting bail. The court shall weigh the needs of the public to retain the property against the needs of the defendant to a portion of the property. The court shall consider the factors listed in paragraph (3) prior to making an order releasing property for these purposes. 

(5) The court, in making its orders, shall seek to protect the interests of innocent third parties, including an innocent spouse, who were not involved in the commission of criminal activity. 

(6) The orders shall be no more extensive than necessary to effect the remedies available for the crime. In determining the amount of property to be held, the court shall ascertain the amount of fines that are assessed for a violation
 of this chapter and the amount of possible restitution.

(7) A petition filed pursuant to this section is part of the criminal proceedings for purposes of appointment of counsel and shall be assigned to the criminal division of the superior court of the county in which the accusatory pleading was filed. 

(8) Based upon a noticed motion brought by the receiver appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), the court may order an interlocutory sale of property named in the petition when the property is liable to perish, to waste, or to be significantly reduced in value, or when the expenses of maintaining the property are disproportionate to the value of the property. The proceeds of the